Nevada, session 83, AB196.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 641 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board may adopt regulations authorizing:
1. A licensed psychologist to allow a person who is not
licensed pursuant to this chapter to perform certain psychological
tests prescribed by the Board under the direct supervision and
periodic observation of the licensed psychologist; and
2. A person who performs psychological tests as described in
subsection 1 to use the title of “psychometrist” in connection with
the performance of such tests.
Sec. 2. NRS 641.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.250 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, the Board or any of its members, any review panel of a hospital
or an association of psychologists which becomes aware that any
one or combination of the grounds for initiating disciplinary action
may exist as to a person practicing psychology or practicing as a
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee in this State shall, and any other person who is so aware
may, file a written complaint specifying the relevant facts with the
Board.
2. A complaint must not be filed pursuant to subsection 1 if 3
or more years have elapsed since the occurrence of the act or
omission alleged as the grounds for initiating disciplinary action.
3. The Board shall retain all complaints filed with the Board
pursuant to this section for at least 10 years, including, without
limitation, any complaints not acted upon.
Sec. 3. NRS 641.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.440 Any person who:
1. Presents as his or her own the diploma, license, registration
or credentials of another;
2. Gives either false or forged evidence of any kind to the
Board or any member thereof, in connection with an application for
a license or registration;
3. Practices psychology or practices as a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or psychological trainee under a false
or assumed name or falsely personates another psychologist,
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee of a like or different name;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641.0295, 641.390
and 641A.410 [,] and the regulations adopted pursuant to section 1
of this act, represents himself or herself as a psychologist, or uses
any title or description which incorporates the word “psychology,”
“psychological,” “psychologist,” “psychometry,” “psychometrics,”
“psychometrist” or any other term indicating or implying that he or
she is a psychologist, unless he or she has been issued a license;
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641.390, represents
himself or herself as a psychological assistant, psychological intern
or psychological trainee, or uses any title or description which
incorporates the words “psychological assistant,” “psychological
intern” or “psychological trainee” or any other term indicating or
implying that he or she is a psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee, unless he or she has been issued a
registration;
6. Practices psychology unless he or she has been issued a
license; or
7. Practices as a psychological assistant, psychological intern
or psychological trainee unless he or she has been issued a
registration,
 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. NRS 641.2265 is hereby repealed.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)